New York, session 2025-2026, S9122.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 66 of the public service law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 33 to read as follows: 3 33. Develop, publish, and update from time to time, a guidebook on 4 the gas and electric ratemaking process. Such guidebook shall be written 5 in plain language, in a manner easily understood by the general public, 6 and shall be made available in a readily accessible location on the 7 department's website and be included or referenced in any communications 8 relating to the commencement of, or requesting public comment on, a 9 matter affecting any rate or charge that requires a hearing pursuant to 10 this chapter. Such guidebook shall: 11 (a) contain a distinct section to promote public understanding and 12 participation in the gas and electric ratemaking process, which shall 13 include, at a minimum: 14 (i) a basic overview of the ratemaking process, including any commis- 15 sion-approved alternative procedures, regulatory or statutory timelines, 16 and a glossary of relevant terms; 17 (ii) an overview of the role of the public in the ratemaking process, 18 how to comment or otherwise participate, and how the commission reviews 19 and incorporates public comments; 20 (iii) a summary of the legal requirements, components, and goals of 21 the ratemaking process and the roles of the utility corporation, the 22 commissioners, department staff, administrative judges, and intervenors; 23 and 24 (iv) an explanation of how to access ratemaking related documentation 25 and rate case specific summaries and memoranda; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14679-04-6 S. 9122 2 1 (b) contain a distinct section to facilitate the formal intervention 2 and participation of interested or affected parties in the gas and elec- 3 tric ratemaking process, which, in addition to any relevant information 4 required pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, shall include, 5 at a minimum: 6 (i) a detailed and practical description of the ratemaking process, 7 including any commission-approved alternative procedures, the process of 8 intervening and becoming a formal party, and the various ways in which 9 parties may participate; 10 (ii) a summary of the statutory and regulatory rights and responsibil- 11 ities of parties and an overview of the role and powers of administra- 12 tive judges; 13 (iii) an explanation of the principal procedural components of the 14 ratemaking process, such as testimony, motions, interrogatories, discov- 15 ery, evidence, and hearings; 16 (iv) a summary of any commission-approved settlement guidelines, the 17 role of parties in settlement, and an explanation of the standards by 18 which the commission reviews and modifies final proposals prior to 19 adoption; and 20 (v) templates and examples of relevant documents that may be required 21 or submitted by intervening parties. 22 § 2. The guidebook required by this act shall be published, and made 23 available on the department of public service's website, no later than 24 120 days after this act shall have become a law. 25 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.